Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-809.05
Judgeship; primary office; relocation of judge authorized; when.

If a final determination of a district or county court judicial vacancy is made, the Supreme Court shall, after consultation with a representative sampling of the lawyers of the judicial district, determine and announce the county where the primary office for the judgeship shall be located. In designating a primary office, the Supreme Court shall locate judges so as to provide maximum service to all areas of the judicial district. If more than one county is acceptable as a primary office, the Supreme Court may so state and may leave the final choice of the location of the primary office to the judge. The Supreme Court may, after consultation with a representative sampling of the lawyers of the judicial district, relocate a district or county court judge within his or her judicial district. The Supreme Court may pay reasonable moving expenses of a judge when so relocated. The principal criterion used by the Supreme Court when designating a primary office and in relocating judges within a judicial district shall be the judicial workload statistics compiled by the State Court Administrator pursuant to section 24-1007.

Laws 1995, LB 189, § 10;

Laws 2004, LB 1207, § 2.